Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 4. Resolution of Conflicting Claims to Inventoried Property

§ 28.2-1509.
Claims to lands designated in an inventory.

Any person claiming ownership of an interest in lands designated as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland in an initial inventory, or in any amended or supplemental inventory, may bring an action for declaratory judgment to determine title to the land pursuant to §

8.01-184

, an action to establish the boundaries to land pursuant to §

8.01-179

, or an action of ejectment pursuant to §

8.01-131

.

Any action pursuant to subsection A with respect to lands designated as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland in an initial inventory shall be brought within two years following the effective date of this section. Any action to assert a claim in such land shall be barred unless brought within such two-year period.

Any action pursuant to subsection A with respect to lands designated as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland in an amended or supplemental inventory shall be brought within two years following the filing of such amended or supplemental inventory. Any action to assert a claim in such lands shall be barred unless brought within such two-year period.

Upon entry of a final judgment ruling that any lands designated in an initial inventory, or in an amended or supplemental inventory, as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands are not property of the Commonwealth, the Commission shall file an amended inventory correcting its designation of such property.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1510.
Approval of amended or supplemental inventory.

The Commission shall not approve an amended or supplemental inventory, if such amended or supplemental inventory initially designates a parcel of land as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, until notice of the Commission’s intention so to do has been published once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county where such land is located. Such notice shall specify the time and place of a public hearing at which persons affected may appear and present their views. In addition, the Commission shall give written notice of the amended or supplemental inventory, and of the public hearing, to the owner or owners of each parcel so designated, if known, by postpaid mail to the address of the owner as shown in the land records of the circuit court for the county. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate any subsequently filed amended or supplemental inventory because of the inadvertent failure of the Commission to give written notice to any person listed as having an ownership interest in such land in the land records of the circuit court for the county. After the public hearing, the Commission may approve, amend, or disapprove such amended or supplemental inventory.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1511.
Claims to ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands proposed for designation in amended or supplemental inventory.

The Commission shall not file any amended or supplemental inventory, if such amended or supplemental inventory initially designates a parcel of land as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland, unless the Commission has approved such amended or supplemental inventory as provided in §

28.2-1510

. The Commission shall give notice of its intention to file such amended or supplemental inventory to any person listed as having an ownership interest in such land in the land records of the circuit court for the county. The notice shall be sent by postpaid mail to the address of the person as shown on the land book. The Commission shall also cause notice of its intent to file an amended or supplemental inventory to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such land is located.

Any person claiming ownership of an interest in lands described in a notice given pursuant to subsection A may bring an action for declaratory judgment to determine title to the land pursuant to §

8.01-184

, to establish the boundaries to land pursuant to §

8.01-179

, or an action of ejectment pursuant to §

8.01-131

. Any such action shall be brought within two years following publication of the notice pursuant to subsection A; however, the failure of a person claiming ownership of such lands to commence an action within the two-year period as provided in this subsection shall not bar such person from asserting a claim of ownership as provided in §

28.2-1509

.

If an action is not commenced within the two-year period as provided in subsection B, the Commission may file an amended or supplemental inventory designating as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands the parcels as to which no action has been commenced. Upon filing the amended or supplemental inventory, the Commission shall cause to be published a notice as provided in subsection B of §

28.2-1507

.

If an action is commenced within the two-year period as provided in subsection B, the Commission shall not, during the pendency of the action, file an amended or supplemental inventory designating the land which is the subject of the action as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands. Upon the entry of a final judgment ruling that any of such land is not the property of the Commonwealth, the Commission shall correct the amended or supplemental inventory to remove any designation of such land as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland. The Commission may then file the corrected amended or supplemental inventory. Upon the entry of a final judgment ruling that such land is the property of the Commonwealth, the Commission may file an amended or supplemental inventory designating such land as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, and further such final judgment shall bar the assertion of a like claim in any action brought to assert ownership of such land pursuant to §

28.2-1509

. Upon filing an amended or supplemental inventory, the Commission shall cause to be published the notice as provided in subsection B of §

28.2-1507

.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1512.
Effect of disability.

The provisions of §

8.01-237

shall apply with respect to the effect of disabilities on the preservation of a right to bring an action to establish ownership of land pursuant to §§

28.2-1509

and

28.2-1511

.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1513.
Filing of notice of lis pendens.

The Commissioner is authorized to record a notice of lis pendens in order to provide notice of the Commonwealth’s claim of ownership of any property designated in an initial inventory, or in an amended or supplemental inventory filed as provided in §

28.2-1506

, as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowland. The notice shall set forth the name of any person who has, or has asserted, an interest in the property, a description of the property, and a statement that the Commission has determined that the property is ungranted shores of the sea, marsh, or meadowland and is designated as such on a filed inventory. The notice shall be admitted to record in the clerk’s office of the county wherein the property is located.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1514.
Historical evidence.

In any administrative proceeding before the Commission under this chapter, or in any proceeding for the resolution of conflicting claims to inventoried property under Article 4 (§

28.2-1509

et seq.) of this chapter, the Commission or court may consider any relevant and credible evidence including, but not limited to, deeds, grants, maps, plats or other historical documents.

History.

1995, c. 850.